North Dakota, session 69, HB1387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-06-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-06-02. School holidays.
1. Schools may not be in session on the following holidaysdays:
a. Any Sunday.
b. New Year's Day, the first day of January.
c. Good Friday, the Friday preceding Easter Sunday.
d. Memorial Day, the last Monday in May.
e. The anniversary of the Declaration of Independence, the fourth day of July.
f. Labor Day, the first Monday in September.
g. Veteran's Day, the eleventh day of November.
h. Thanksgiving Day, the fourth Thursday in November.
i. Christmas Day, the twenty-fifth day of December.
j. Any day declared to be a public holiday by the President of the United States or
the governor.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, if the first day of January, the fourth
day of July, the eleventh day of November, or the twenty-fifth day of December is a
Sunday, the school district shall observe the holiday on the following Monday.
Page No. 1 25.1066.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, if the eleventh day of November is a
Saturday, the school district shall observe the holiday on the preceding Friday.
4. The board of a school district may direct that classes not be held onshall cancel
classes or separate students to ensure there is no opportunity for student contact with
voters on the day of a national, statewide, or local election if the school is used as a
polling place on that day during regular school hours.
Page No. 2 25.1066.02000